Washington statutes.
RCW 40.16.030

Offering false instrument for filing or record.

Every person who shall knowingly procure or offer any false or forged instrument to be filed, registered, or recorded in any public office, which instrument, if genuine, might be filed, registered or recorded in such office under any law of this state or of the United States, is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 216; 1992 c 7 s 36; 1909 c 249 s 97; RRS s 2349.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.